District of Columbia statutes.
2-1535.09

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of this title [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Sept. 14, 2012, D.C. Law 19-167, § 10, 59 DCR 7820
For temporary addition of provisions concerning a juvenile drug screening and treatment diversion plan, see § 513 of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).